Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-104
Speech; legislative privilege.

No member of the Legislature shall be questioned in any other place for any speech or words spoken in debate in the Legislature.

R.S.1866, c. 31, § 6, p. 249;

R.S.1913, § 3745;

C.S.1922, § 3138;

C.S.1929, § 50-104;

R.S.1943, § 50-104.